Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 355 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12Q Income tax form ââ easy 1 enrollment health care coverage program. 2 1. The department, in cooperation with the department of 3 health and human services and the insurance division, shall 4 establish an easy enrollment health care coverage program 5 utilizing the state income tax form to identify residents 6 of the state who are uninsured but may qualify for benefits 7 under a health care coverage program. The easy enrollment 8 health care coverage program shall be designed to do all of the 9 following: 10 a. Facilitate identification of taxpayers and members of 11 taxpayersâ households who are uninsured. 12 b. Provide taxpayers with a method to authorize the 13 department to share insurance-relevant information with the 14 Iowa health insurance marketplace and the department of health 15 and human services for the purpose of assessing eligibility for 16 a health care coverage program. 17 c. Provide for automatic enrollment or provisionally 18 assessed eligibility of the taxpayer or a member of the 19 taxpayerâs household in the Medicaid program or other health 20 care coverage program. 21 d. Facilitate enrollment in a health care coverage program. 22 2. For the tax year beginning January 1, 2025, the director 23 or the directorâs designee shall develop the income tax form to 24 include all of the following options for a taxpayer who files 25 an individual or joint income tax return with the department 26 under section 422.13: 27 a. A check box indicting that the taxpayer filing the tax 28 return either has or does not have health care coverage. 29 b. A check box indicating that the spouse of the taxpayer 30 filing the tax return either has or does not have health care 31 coverage. 32 c. A check box indicating each dependent of the taxpayer who 33 does not have health care coverage, and a space to indicate the 34 birth date of each such dependent. 35 -1- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 11 H.F. 355 d. A check box indicating each member of the taxpayerâs 1 household who is not the spouse of the taxpayer or a dependent 2 of the taxpayer, the individualâs relationship to the taxpayer, 3 the individualâs birth date, and whether the individual has 4 health care coverage. 5 e. A check box authorizing the department to share 6 insurance-relevant information with the Iowa health insurance 7 marketplace and the department of health and human services. 8 f. A check box authorizing the department of health and 9 human services to enroll the taxpayer or a member of the 10 taxpayerâs household in the Medicaid program if the department 11 of health and human services has sufficient insurance-relevant 12 information to complete an eligibility determination for the 13 taxpayer or a member of the taxpayerâs household, but only if 14 the taxpayer or the member of the taxpayerâs household will not 15 be subject to any cost including deductibles or copayments for 16 such health care coverage. 17 g. An email address, telephone number, or other preferred 18 method of communicating with the taxpayer for additional 19 contact by the Iowa health insurance marketplace or the 20 department of health and human services. 21 3. If a taxpayer indicates on the income tax form that 22 the taxpayer or anyone in the taxpayerâs household does 23 not have health care coverage, and the taxpayer authorizes 24 the department to share the taxpayerâs insurance-relevant 25 information with the Iowa health insurance marketplace and 26 the department of health and human services, the department 27 shall forward to the Iowa health insurance marketplace and to 28 the department of health and human services the taxpayerâs 29 insurance-relevant information and a copy of the taxpayerâs 30 authorization. 31 4. a. Upon receiving a taxpayerâs insurance-relevant 32 information and authorization from the department under 33 this section, the Iowa health insurance marketplace and the 34 department of health and human services shall assess the 35 -2- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 2/ 11 H.F. 355 taxpayerâs eligibility or the eligibility of the members of the 1 taxpayerâs household for a health care coverage program. 2 b. (1) Following the assessment, if the department of 3 health and human services has sufficient insurance-relevant 4 information to determine the taxpayer or a member of the 5 taxpayerâs household is eligible for the Medicaid program, the 6 department shall do one of the following: 7 (a) If the taxpayer authorized such enrollment, enroll 8 the eligible taxpayer or eligible member of the taxpayerâs 9 household in the Medicaid program. 10 (b) If the taxpayer did not authorize such enrollment in the 11 Medicaid program, contact the taxpayer and provide the taxpayer 12 with information on the Medicaid program. 13 (2) Following the assessment, if the department of 14 health and human services has sufficient insurance-relevant 15 information to determine the taxpayer or a member of the 16 taxpayerâs household is not eligible for the Medicaid program 17 but may be eligible for other health care coverage programs 18 under the purview of the department, contact the taxpayer to 19 provide the taxpayer with information about the other health 20 care coverage program options including specific benefits 21 and cost-sharing requirements, enrollment instructions, and 22 enrollment assistance. 23 (3) Following the assessment, if the department of health 24 and human services does not have sufficient insurance-relevant 25 information to determine if the taxpayer or a member of the 26 taxpayerâs household is eligible for the Medicaid program 27 or other health care coverage programs under the purview of 28 the department, contact the taxpayer to obtain sufficient 29 information to make a determination. 30 c. Following the assessment, if the Iowa health insurance 31 marketplace determines the taxpayer or a member of the 32 taxpayerâs household may be eligible for a qualified health 33 plan or financial assistance through the Iowa health insurance 34 marketplace, the Iowa health insurance marketplace shall 35 -3- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 3/ 11 H.F. 355 contact the taxpayer and provide the taxpayer with information 1 on all of the following: 2 (1) Qualified health plans available to the taxpayer or 3 a member of the taxpayerâs household through the Iowa health 4 insurance marketplace. 5 (2) Specific enrollment instructions and information 6 on enrollment assistance for each of the qualified health 7 plans available to the taxpayer or a member of the taxpayerâs 8 household. 9 (3) Information on the federal premium assistance credit 10 provided pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Â§36B. 11 5. Notwithstanding any state confidentiality or privacy 12 protection or other provision of law to the contrary, the 13 department may share confidential tax return information with 14 the department of health and human services and the Iowa health 15 insurance marketplace to the extent the confidential tax return 16 information constitutes insurance-relevant information and the 17 department has received the taxpayerâs consent to share the 18 information. 19 6. The provision of information by a taxpayer under this 20 section is voluntary and a taxpayer shall not be subject to a 21 penalty for not providing the information specified under this 22 section. 23 7. The department, the department of health and human 24 services, and the insurance division shall collaboratively do 25 all of the following: 26 a. Develop the instructions for completion of the income 27 tax return form and compile other information to accompany the 28 income tax form provided to taxpayers under this section. 29 b. Define terms for the purposes of both completion of the 30 income tax form and for information about and eligibility for 31 health care coverage programs including the terms âdependentâ 32 and âhouseholdâ. 33 c. Develop outreach educational materials and programming 34 to communicate the availability and the purpose of the easy 35 -4- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 4/ 11 H.F. 355 enrollment health care coverage program to the public. The 1 materials and programming shall include materials developed for 2 different target groups, including but not limited to in-person 3 and online tax preparers, consumer assistance organizations, 4 community groups, and underserved groups. 5 d. Enter into any data-sharing agreements necessary to 6 facilitate insurance-relevant information sharing and tracking, 7 eligibility verification procedures, and outreach efforts. 8 e. Consider criteria for automatic exclusions such as 9 taxpayers who do not reside in the state. 10 f. Notify and provide training for both in-person tax 11 preparers and electronic tax preparation programs regarding the 12 changes to the tax forms to facilitate software updates and 13 compliance. 14 g. Automate the tracking and response mechanisms to the 15 greatest extent possible. 16 h. Develop and utilize any other processes or procedures 17 that facilitate the easy enrollment health care coverage 18 program. 19 8. Beginning January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, 20 the department, the department of health and human services, 21 and the insurance division shall collaboratively report to 22 the governor and the general assembly all of the following 23 information based on the immediately preceding calendar yearâs 24 tax return data: 25 a. The number of taxpayers who indicated on their tax form 26 that the taxpayer, the taxpayerâs spouse, a dependent of the 27 taxpayer, or another household member of the taxpayer did not 28 have health care coverage. 29 b. The number of taxpayers who authorized the sharing of 30 insurance-relevant information for the purposes of assessing 31 eligibility for a health care coverage program. 32 c. The number of taxpayers or members of a taxpayerâs 33 household provisionally assessed as eligible for a health care 34 coverage program. 35 -5- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 5/ 11 H.F. 355 d. The number of taxpayers or members of a taxpayerâs 1 household who enrolled in a health care coverage program as the 2 result of the easy enrollment health care coverage program, and 3 the type of health care coverage program in which the person 4 enrolled. 5 e. Demographic data on enrollment in specific health care 6 coverage programs resulting from the easy enrollment health 7 care coverage program. 8 f. Recommendations to improve outreach materials, address 9 issues related to information required for establishing 10 eligibility while maintaining confidentiality, and other 11 proposed changes to improve the easy enrollment health care 12 coverage program. 13 9. The department, the department of health and human 14 services, and the insurance division shall each adopt rules 15 pursuant to chapter 17A to jointly implement and administer 16 the easy enrollment health care coverage program under this 17 section. 18 10. As used in this section: 19 a. âAffordable Care Actâ means the federal Patient 20 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, as 21 amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation 22 Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-152, and any amendments thereto. 23 b. âHealth care coverage programâ means the Medicaid 24 program, the healthy and well kids in Iowa program, the Iowa 25 health and wellness plan, or a qualified health plan available 26 through the Iowa health insurance marketplace. 27 c. âHealthy and well kids in Iowa programâ or âHawki programâ 28 means the Hawki program as defined in section 514I.2. 29 d. âHouseholdâ means the spouse, any dependent, and any 30 other individual who resides with the taxpayer but is not 31 claimed as a spouse or dependent on the taxpayerâs income tax 32 return. 33 e. âInsurance divisionâ means the insurance division of the 34 department of insurance and financial services. 35 -6- LSB 2186YH (2) 91 jm/jh 6/ 11 H.F. 355 f. âInsurance-relevant informationâ means information 1 pertaining to the insurance enrollment status of a taxpayer 2 or members of a taxpayerâs household and that is derived or 3 obtained from the taxpayerâs state income tax return; provided 4 that information is limited to information necessary to assess 5 the eligibility of the taxpayer or members of the taxpayerâs 6 household for health coverage programs and includes: 7 (1) Adjusted gross income and other types of reported income 8 used to assess eligibility for a health coverage program. 9 (2) Household size. 10 (3) Claimed dependents. 11 (4) Contact information and personally identifying 12 information necessary to assess health coverage program 13 eligibility and used to match against relevant third-party data 14 sources. 15 (5) Any other information necessary to determine 16 eligibility for a health care coverage program as specified by 17 rule of the department, in consultation with the department of 18 health and human services and the insurance division. 19 g. âIowa health and wellness planâ means the Iowa health and 20 wellness plan established in chapter 249N. 21 h. âIowa health insurance marketplaceâ means the American 22 health benefits exchange created pursuant to the Affordable 23 Care Act. 24 i. âMedicaid programâ means the same as defined in section 25 249A.2. 26 j. âQualified health planâ means an insurance plan that is 27 certified by the Iowa health insurance marketplace, provides 28 essential health benefits, follows established limits on 29 cost-sharing including for deductibles, copayments, and 30 out-of-pocket maximum amounts, and meets other requirements 31 under the Affordable Care Act. 32